Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.150

Emergencies subject to hearing—Right of taxpayer to review order.

No expenditure shall be made or liability incurred pursuant to the order until a period of five days, exclusive of the day of entry of the order, have elapsed, during which time any taxpayer or taxpayers of the county feeling aggrieved by the order may have the superior court of the county review it by filing with the clerk of such court a verified petition, a copy of which has been served upon the county auditor. The petition shall set forth in detail the objections of the petitioners to the order and the reasons why the alleged emergency does not exist.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.40.150. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 143 s 2, part; 1923 c 164 s 6, part; RRS s 3997-6, part.]